Hawaii statutes.
§501-27 Land bounded on way. If the
application describes the land as bounded on a public or private way, it shall
state whether or not the applicant claims any and what land within the limits
of the way, and whether the applicant desires to have the line of the way
determined. [L 1903, c 56, §25; RL 1925, §3214; RL 1935, §5018; RL 1945,
§12618; RL 1955, §342-19; HRS §501-27]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next